Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 55. State Teachers’ Retirement System of Vermont
§ 1944e.
Retired teachers health and medical benefits.

Payment of a portion of the cost of health and medical benefits provided by subsection 1942(p) of this title for retired members and their dependents shall be made from the Benefits Fund. The Board shall determine the total costs of the applicable standard plan for a retired member and of the applicable standard plan for a retired member and spouse, and the Board shall pay the following portion of those costs:

For retired members:

80 percent of the cost for a retired member who has either at least 10 years of creditable service as of July 1, 2010, or 25 years of creditable service at the time of retirement;

70 percent of the cost for a retired member who has fewer than 10 years of creditable service as of July 1, 2010, and 20 years or more but fewer than 25 years of creditable service at the time of retirement;

60 percent of the cost for a retired member who has fewer than 10 years of creditable service as of July 1, 2010, and 15 or more but fewer than 20 years of creditable service at the time of retirement; and

for retired members who do not meet the requirements of subdivisions (A) through (C) of this subdivision (1), no portion of the costs shall be paid.

For a retired member’s spouse. In addition to the payments for retired members’ health and medical benefits specified in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, 80 percent of the cost for the retired member’s spouse during the retired member’s life, where:

the retired member has fewer than 15 years of creditable service as of July 1, 2010, and at least 25 years of creditable service at the time of retirement; or

the retired member has 15 or more but fewer than 25 years of creditable service as of July 1, 2010, and at least 10 additional years of creditable service at the time of retirement; or

the retired member has 25 or more but fewer than 30 years of creditable service as of July 1, 2010, and at least 35 years of creditable service at the time of retirement; or

the retired member has at least 30 years of creditable service as of July 1, 2010, and at least five additional years of creditable service at the time of retirement; and

the service was not purchased, restored, granted, or transferred on or after July 1, 2010.

The Board shall pay an equal dollar amount for eligible retirees regardless of the plan selected. All eligible retirees may select health plan coverage from a range of plans approved by the Board. Retired members may authorize deductions to be made from their monthly retirement allowance for the balance of the cost of such benefits for the retired members and their dependents.

Periodically, the Board shall approve the following:

a standard plan for retirees who are not yet eligible for Medicare, which plan shall provide first dollar coverage for subscribers;

a standard plan for retirees who are eligible for Medicare, which plan shall provide first dollar coverage for subscribers; and

a range of plans that may be selected by retirees, including the standard applicable plans.

For fiscal year 2004 and thereafter, the cost of the applicable standard plan determined under this subsection shall not exceed the cost of the $250.00 comprehensive plan offered in fiscal year 2003, adjusted for the appropriate fiscal year. In the event of the discontinuance of the $250.00 comprehensive plan, a plan with a comparable expenditure profile shall be used as a benchmark.

As of January 1, 2007 and thereafter, upon retirement, members entitled to prorated Group medical benefit plan premium payments from the Retirement System under the terms of this section shall have a one-time option to reduce the percentage of premium payments from the Benefits Fund during the member’s life, with the provision that the Benefits Fund shall continue making an equal percentage of premium payments after the member’s death for the life of the dependent beneficiary nominated by the member under section 1941 of this title, should such dependent beneficiary survive the member. The Board, after consultation with its actuary, shall establish reduced premium payment percentages that are as cost neutral to the Benefits Fund as possible.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 21; amended

2019, No. 25

, § 2, eff. May 16, 2019.

§ 1945.
Application of other laws.

No other provision of law in any other statute that provides wholly or partly at the expense of the State of Vermont for pensions or retirement benefits for teachers of the State, their widows, or other dependents, shall apply to members or beneficiaries of the Retirement System hereby established, their widows, or other dependents.

§ 1946.
Exemption of member’s interest; assignment.

That portion of the compensation of a member deducted or to be deducted under this chapter, the rights of a member or beneficiary to an annuity, pension, or retirement allowance hereunder, and all a member’s rights in the assets of the System, shall be exempt from taxation, including income tax, and from the operation of any laws relating to bankruptcy or insolvency, and shall not be attached or taken upon execution or other process of any court. No assignment by a member or beneficiary of any part of the assets to which he or she is or may be entitled, or of any right to or interest in the assets, shall be valid except as specifically provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

2007, No. 13

, § 34.

§ 1946a.
Tax exemption for member of retirement system of another state or political subdivision thereof.

Payments received by a member of a retirement system of another state or political subdivision thereof, whether called a pension, an annuity, a retirement allowance, or any other name, shall be exempt from taxation, including income tax, provided that such member was at the time of retirement a member of the teaching or supervising staff covered by such retirement system. The term “teaching or supervising staff” shall include the superintendent, assistant superintendents, principals, supervisors, assistant supervisors, directors, assistant directors, examiners, supervising school physicians, supervisors of health education, supervising nurses, and all other persons permanently employed in giving or supervising instruction in a public day school, normal school, teachers’ college, or other educational institution located in, and supported and controlled by, any state or political subdivision thereof.

§ 1946b.
Alternate payee; domestic relations orders.

As used in this section:

“Alternate payee” means any individual who is recognized by a domestic relations order as having a right to receive all, or a portion of, another individual’s payment rights in the System.

“Domestic relations order” means a judgment, decree, or order of the Family Division of the Superior Court issued pursuant to 4 V.S.A. chapter 10, concerning marital property rights that includes a transfer of all, or a portion of, a member’s or beneficiary’s payment rights in the System to an alternate payee. It also means a judgment, decree, or order from a court of competent jurisdiction in another state, concerning marital property rights that includes a transfer of all, or a portion of, a member’s or beneficiary’s payment rights in the System to an alternate payee. Domestic relations orders shall conform to the requirements of this section in order to be effective. A domestic relations order does not take effect until it is served on the System by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested. In the event that there is more than one domestic relations order, the order that is most recent in time and that has been served on the System will control.

A member’s or beneficiary’s rights in the System may be modified by a domestic relations order as provided in this section.

A domestic relations order shall contain all of the following elements:

the identity of the member or beneficiary and the alternate payee by full name, current address, and Social Security number;

the amount or percentage of the member’s or beneficiary’s benefits to be paid by the Board to the alternate payee and the date or dates upon which the calculation of payments is to be based;

the number of payments or time period in which payments are required to be made under the domestic relations order; and

each retirement plan to which the domestic relations order applies.

A domestic relations order shall not provide:

for a type or form of benefit, option, or payment not available to the affected member or beneficiary;

for an amount or duration of payment greater than that available to the affected member or beneficiary;

that payment of a retirement allowance commence before the member departs from service and commences to receive benefits;

withdrawal of the member’s contributions without the consent of the member and the alternate payee; or

any requirements that are contrary to the intent of this section.

A domestic relations order may provide for apportionment of post-retirement adjustments to the retirement allowance.

Payments to the alternate payee under a domestic relations order shall be limited to the life of the member or beneficiary.

An alternate payee’s rights and interests under this section shall not survive the alternate payee’s death and shall not be transferable by inheritance.

An alternate payee’s rights or interests acquired pursuant to this section are not subject to assignment, execution, garnishment, attachment, or other process. An alternate payee’s rights or interests may be modified only by a domestic relations order amending the domestic relations order that established the right or interest.

The Board, the System, its agents, and employees shall not be liable to any person for carrying out the terms and conditions of a domestic relations order.

The Board may adopt rules to implement this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 36

, § 8; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2021, No. 20

, § 63.

§ 1947.
Penalty.

Whoever with intent to deceive shall make any statements or reports required under this chapter that are untrue, or shall falsify or permit to be falsified any record or records of the System, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punishable therefor under the laws of this State.

§ 1948.
Errors.

Should any mistake be made, or should any change or error in the records result in any member or beneficiary receiving from the System more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the Board shall have the power, in its discretion, to correct such mistake or such error, and as far as practicable, to adjust the payments in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid or in such a manner that the impact upon the fund is de minimis.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 1949.
Postretirement adjustments to retirement allowances.

Postretirement Adjustments to Retirement allowance. On January 1 of each year, the retirement allowance of each beneficiary of the System who is in receipt of a retirement allowance for at least a one-year period as of December 31 in the previous year, and who meets the eligibility criteria set forth in this section, shall be adjusted by the amount described in subsection (b) of this section. In no event shall a beneficiary receive a negative adjustment to the beneficiary’s retirement allowance.

Calculation of Net Percentage Increase. Each year, a determination shall be made of any increase or decrease, to the nearest one-tenth of a percent, in the Consumer Price Index for the month ending on June 30 of that year to the average of the Consumer Price Index for the month ending on June 30 of the previous year.

Consumer Price Index; maximum and minimum amounts. Any increase or decrease in the Consumer Price Index shall be subject to adjustment so as to remain within the following maximum and minimum amounts:

For Group A members and Group C members who are eligible for normal retirement or unreduced early retirement on or before June 30, 2022, the maximum amount of any increase or decrease utilized to determine the net percentage increase shall be five percent.

For Group C members who are eligible for retirement and leave active service on or after July 1, 2022, the maximum amount of any increase or decrease utilized to determine the net percentage increase shall be four percent.

Consumer Price Index; decreases. In the event of a decrease of the Consumer Price Index as of June 30 for the preceding year, there shall be no adjustment to the retirement allowance of a beneficiary for the subsequent year beginning January 1; provided, however, that:

such decrease shall be applied as an offset against the first subsequent year’s increase of the Consumer Price Index up to the full amount of such increase; and

to the extent that such decrease is greater than such subsequent year’s increase, such decrease shall be offset in the same manner against two or more years of such increases, for up to but not exceeding five subsequent years of such increases, until fully offset.

Consumer Price Index; increases. Subject to the maximum and minimum amounts set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection, in the event of an increase in the Consumer Price Index, and provided there remains an increase following the application of any offset as in subdivision (2) of this subsection, that amount shall be identified as the net percentage increase and used to determine the members’ postretirement adjustment as set forth in subsection (d) of this section.

Eligibility for postretirement adjustment. In order for a beneficiary to receive a postretirement adjustment allowance, the beneficiary must meet the following eligibility requirements:

for any Group A or Group C member eligible for retirement on or before June 30, 2022, the member must be in receipt of a retirement allowance for at least 12 months prior to the January 1 effective date of any postretirement adjustment; and

for any Group C member who is eligible for retirement and leaves active service on or after July 1, 2022, the member must be in receipt of a retirement allowance for at least 24 months prior to the January 1 effective date of any postretirement adjustment.

As used in this section, “Consumer Price Index” shall mean the Northeast Region Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers, designated as “CPI-U,” in the northeast region, as published by the U.S. Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1981, No. 41

, § 35;

1989, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1991, No. 64

, § 8, eff. June 18, 1991;

1991, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1999, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2009, No. 74

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 6a, 6b, 7, 13;

2011, No. 63

, § H.2;

2015, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 88;

2021, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 1950.
Repealed.
1989, No. 169 (Adj. Sess.), § 11.

§ 1951.
Group A members; limit on contributions.

Contributions in the form of a deduction from compensation under section 1944 of this title shall cease for any Group A member who attains 25 years of creditable service and the member shall continue to accrue creditable service, without such a contribution, at the rate of one and two-thirds percent until the member retires.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 169

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 23.

§ 1952.
Repealed. 2013, No. 22, § 17, eff. July 1, 2013.

§ 1953.
Prior service credit.

A teacher who has ceased being a member upon reemployment is entitled to prior service credit upon depositing in the Pension Fund the contributions that would have been deducted from the teacher’s compensation had he or she remained a member with interest as set forth in section 1944 of this title. The teacher, in order to qualify for the prior service credit, shall also deposit in the Fund a sum equal to the contributions that would have been contributed by the State had the teacher remained a member with interest as set forth in section 1944 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2007, No. 13

, § 35;

2017, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.